Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6306
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Disclosure of Material Insurance Transactions Act.

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 6.